Utah statutes.
34A-2-604.   Employee leaving place of treatment.

(1)  An injured employee who desires to leave the locality in which the employee has been employed during the treatment of the employee's injury, or to leave this state, shall:

(a)  report to the employee's attending physician for examination;

(b)  notify the division in writing of the intention to leave; and

(c)  accompany the notice with a certificate from the attending physician setting forth:

(i)  the exact nature of the injury;

(ii)  the condition of the employee; and

(iii)  a statement of the probable length of time disability will continue.

(2)  An employee may leave the locality in which the employee was employed only after:

(a)  complying with Subsection (1); and

(b)  receiving the written consent of the division.

(3)  If an employee does not comply with this section, compensation may not be allowed during the absence.

